Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Subchapter 2. Gasoline Receptacles

§ 3381.
Labels and color of cans.

A receptacle containing gasoline or benzol of capacity not more than five gallons, except a motor vehicle, motor boat, gasoline engine, gasoline stove or lamp, shall be painted red and be labeled “gasoline” or “benzol,” as the case may be, in letters of a contrasting color and of a height of not less than one-half inch, or shall bear a red label similarly lettered of sufficient size to be conspicuous. A person shall not keep gasoline or benzol in a receptacle not conforming to the requirements of this section.

A person who violates a provision of subsection (a) of this section shall be fined not more than $50.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

2021, No. 20

, § 31.